en: coconut paste
bg: кокосова паста
de: Kokospaste, Kokosmus, Kokosnusspaste, Kokosnussmus
fr: pâte de noix de coco
hr: pasta od kokosa
it: pasta di cocco
nl: kokospuree
pl: pasta kokosowa

en: date, dates
ar: تمر
be: Фінікі
bg: Фурма, фурми
ca: dàtil
cs: datle
da: Daddel, dadler
de: Dattel, Datteln
el: Χουρμάς
eo: daktilo
es: dátil, dátiles
et: Datlid
eu: Datil
fi: taateli, taatelit
fr: datte, dattes
gl: Dátil
gu: બોર
he: תמר, תמרים
hr: datulja, datulje, datumi, datum
ht: Dat
ia: Dactylo
it: dattero, datteri
kn: ಖರ್ಜೂರದ ಹಣ್ಣು
lt: Datulė
nl: dadel, dadels
nn: dadler
nv: Hashkʼaan dijéʼé
pl: Daktyle, daktyl, daktyli, daktylowa, daktylowe
ro: Curmală, curmale
ru: финик, финики
sk: Datľa
sv: dadel, dadlar
tr: hurma
tt: хөрмә җимеше
uk: фініки
zh: 椰枣

en: organic dates
bg: био фурми
de: Bio Datteln
fi: luomutaateli, luomu taateli
fr: dattes bio
hr: organske datulje
it: datteri bio

en: deglet nour dates
de: Deglet Nour Datteln, Datteln Deglet Nour, Datteln (Deglet Nour)
es: dátiles deglet nour
fr: dattes deglet nour
hr: deglet nour datulje
it: datteri deglet nour
nl: deglet nour dadels
pt: tâmaras deglet nour
ru: финики деглет нур

en: medjool dates
de: Medjool Datteln
es: dátiles Medjool
fr: dattes Medjool
hr: medjool datulje
it: Datteri Medjool
nl: Medjool dadels
pl: daktyle medjool, daktyle odmiany medjoool
pt: Tâmaras Medjool
ru: меджул даты

en: Mazafati dates
de: Mazafati Datteln
fr: dattes Mazafati

en: Kalooteh dates, Kalute dates, Kloteh dates, Kaluteh dates, Kali dates
de: Kalooteh Datteln

en: Kenta dates
de: Kenta Datteln
fr: dattes Kenta
it: datteri Kenta

en: Khudri dates, Khidri dates
de: Khudri Datteln, Khidri Datteln
it: datteri Khudri

en: Sukkary dates
de: Sukkari Datteln
fr: dattes Sukkari

en: date paste
de: pürierte Datteln
fr: pâte de datte
hr: pasta od datulja
it: pasta di datteri
nl: dadelpuree
pl: pasta daktylowa
sv: dadelpuré

en: date juice
it: succo di datteri

en: concentrated date juice
it: succo di datteri concentrato

en: elder
cs: černého bezu
da: hyld
de: Holunder
es: saúco
fi: selja
fr: sureau
hr: stariji
it: sambuco
la: sambuca nigra
nb: hyll
nl: vlier
nn: hyll
pl: czarny bez, czarnego bzu
sv: fläder

en: elderberry, elderberries
bg: Бъз
cs: bezinka, bezinky
da: hyldebær
de: Holunderbeer, Holunderbeere, Holunderbeeren
es: bayas del sauco
fi: seljanmarja
fr: baie de sureau, baies de sureau
hr: bazga, bazge, bazga plod
nl: vlierbes
pl: owoc czarnego bzu, owoce czarnego bzu, jagody czarnego bzu, jagoda czarnego bzu, owoc bzu czarnego
sv: fläderbär

en: elderberry juice
bg: сок от бъз
de: Holundersaft
es: Jugo de saúco
fi: seljanmarjamehu, seljanmarjatäysmehu
fr: jus de sureau
hr: sok od bazge
it: succo di sambuco
nl: vlierbessap
pl: sok z czarnego bzu
pt: Suco de sabugo, sumo de sabugo
sv: fläderbärsjuice

en: elderberry juice concentrate, concentrated elderberry juice
de: konzentrierter Holundersaft
es: concentrado de zumo de saúco, concentrado de jugo de saúco
fi: seljanmarjamehutiiviste, seljanmarjatäysmehutiiviste
fr: jus de sureau concentré, jus concentré de sureau
hr: koncentrat soka od bazge
it: Sciroppo di sambuco concentrato
pl: koncentrat soku z czarnego bzu, zagęszczony sok z czarnego bzu
sv: koncentrerad fläderbärsjuice

en: elderberry juice from concentrate
bg: сок от бъз от концентрат
de: Holundersaft aus Konzentrat
fi: seljanmarjamehu tiivisteestä, seljanmarjatäysmehu tiivisteestä
fr: jus de sureau à base de concentré
hr: sok od bazge iz koncentrata
it: succo di sambuco a base di concentrato, succo concentrato di sambuco

en: elderberry extract
bg: екстракт от бъз
de: Holunderbeerenextrakt, Holunderbeerextrakt
es: extracto de saúco
fi: seljanmarjauute
fr: extrait de baie de sureau, extrait de sureau
hr: ekstrakt bazge
it: estratto di sambuco
pl: ekstrakt z czarnego bzu, ekstrakt czarnego bzu
sv: fläderbär extract

en: natural elderberry extract
de: natürlicher Holunderbeerenextrakt
es: extracto natural de sauco
fi: luonnollinen seljanmarja-uute
fr: extrait naturel de sureau
hr: prirodni ekstrakt bazge
it: estratto naturale di sambuco
nl: natuurlijk vlierbessenextract
pl: naturalny ekstrakt z czarnego bzu
sv: naturligt fläderbärsextrakt